Utah statutes.
48-1d-803.   Liability of person dissociated as partner to other persons.

(1)  A person's dissociation as a partner does not of itself discharge the person's liability as a partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership incurred before dissociation.  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), the person is not liable for a partnership obligation incurred after dissociation.

(2)  A person that has dissociated as a partner without the dissociation resulting in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership's activities and affairs is liable on a transaction entered into by the partnership after the dissociation only if:

(a)  a partner would be liable on the transaction; and

(b)  at the time the other party enters into the transaction:

(i)  less than two years has passed since the dissociation; and

(ii)  the other party does not have knowledge or notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a partner.

(3)  By agreement with a creditor of a partnership and the partnership, a person dissociated as a partner may be released from liability for an obligation of the partnership.

(4)  A person dissociated as a partner is released from liability for an obligation of the partnership if the partnership's creditor, with knowledge or notice of the person's dissociation but without the person's consent, agrees to a material alteration in the nature or time of payment of the obligation.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

